Kentucky statutes. TITLE VII Public Property and Public Printing
Property and Buildings Commission

56.340.
Kentucky Building Commission created — Membership. [Repealed.]

56.350.
Power of commission to determine need for lands, buildings and facilities for state agencies — Plans and specifications — Advertisement for bids — Awarding of contracts — Supervision of work — Personnel. [Repealed.]

56.360.
Purposes for which capital outlay appropriations to be spent — Agencies enumerated. [Repealed.]

56.370.
Division of Engineering transferred from Welfare Department to commission — Duties of division — Chief Engineer. [Repealed.]

56.380.
Travel expenses for members of commission. [Repealed.]

56.390.
Contracts for capital outlay of more than ten thousand dollars must be approved by commission — Conditions of approval. [Repealed.]

56.400.
Powers of commission with respect to purchase, lease or sale of real estate — Allocation of cost of land and building projects — Title to real estate when revenue bonds issued, lease agreements — Eminent domain — Lease of state lands and buildings to private interests. [Repealed.]

56.410.
Issuance of revenue bonds by commission. [Repealed.]

56.420.
Abandonment of uncompleted building projects — Settlement with architects, engineers and contractors. [Repealed.]

56.430.
KRS 56.340 to 56.420 not applicable to road or school projects. [Repealed.]

56.440.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the State Property and Buildings Commission;

“Real estate” includes lands together with improvements thereon and appurtenances thereto;

“Building” includes any structure or improvement upon real estate of a permanent nature and additionally includes any sites, structures, equipment, machinery, or devices for the purpose of establishing, developing, or furthering television or related services in aid of education or in aid of any other proper public functions, whether or not the same would otherwise be legally defined as buildings; but only (except for industrial development projects) if used or to be used by the Commonwealth of Kentucky or one (1) of its departments or agencies (not including independent municipal corporations or political subdivisions);

“Building project” includes the acquisition of any real estate and the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, and structural maintenance of buildings, the installation of utility services, including roads and sewers, and the purchase and installation of equipment, facilities, and furnishings of a permanent nature for buildings; the purchase and installation initially of movable equipment, furnishings, and appurtenances necessary to make a building operable; and for television or related purposes as referred to in subsection (3) of this section, for use by the state government or one (1) of its departments or agencies, not including any independent municipal corporation or political subdivision, or any other capital outlay program authorized by any branch budget bill or other legislation;

“Industrial development project” means and includes the acquisition of any real estate and the construction, acquisition, and installation thereon and with respect thereto of improvements and facilities necessary and useful for the improvement of such real estate for conveyance to or lease to industrial entities to be used for manufacturing, processing, or assembling purposes, including surveys, site tests and inspections, subsurface site work, excavation, removal of structures, roadways, cemeteries, and other surface obstructions, filling, grading and provision of drainage, storm water detention, installation of utilities such as water, sewer, sewage treatment, gas, electricity, communication, and other similar facilities, off- site construction of utility extensions to the boundaries of such real estate, construction and installation of buildings, including buildings to be used for worker training and education, rail facilities, roads, sidewalks, curbs, and other improvements to such real estate necessary to its manufacturing, processing, or assembling use by industrial entities; provided that an industrial entity must have agreed with the commission, prior to the financing of an industrial development project, to develop, in conjunction with such industrial development project, manufacturing, processing, or assembling facilities satisfactory to the commission;

“Industrial entity” means any corporation, partnership, person, or other legal entity, whether domestic or foreign, which will itself or through its subsidiaries and affiliates construct and develop a manufacturing, processing, or assembling facility on the site of an industrial development project financed pursuant to this chapter;

“Incremental taxes” means, for any fiscal year of the Commonwealth, that amount of money which is equal to all tax revenues received by the Commonwealth, as taxing entity, during such fiscal year in respect of an industrial development project and improvements and equipment thereon and the products thereof, and activities carried out by the occupants and users of such industrial development project, minus an amount equal to all tax revenues received by the Commonwealth, as taxing entity, in respect of the site of the industrial development project and the same type of taxable properties and activities during the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year during which construction of the improvements undertaken by an industrial entity as a result of the financing of such industrial development project commenced. Incremental taxes shall include such tax revenues as state corporate income taxes, state income taxes paid by employees of manufacturing, processing, and assembling facilities developed on the site of an industrial development project, state property taxes, state corporation license taxes, and state sales and use taxes, but shall not include any taxes levied specifically for educational purposes;

“State agency” means any state administrative body, agency, department, or division as defined in KRS

42.005

, or any board, commission, institution, or division exercising any function of the state but which is not an independent municipal corporation or political subdivision;

“Cabinet” means the Finance and Administration Cabinet;

“Asbestos” means the asbestiform varieties of: chrysotile (serpentine); crocidolite (riebeckite); amosite (cummingtonite-grunerite); anthophyllite; tremolite; and actinolite;

“Asbestos-containing material” means any material which contains more than one percent (1%) asbestos by weight;

“Friable material” means any material applied onto ceilings, walls, structural members, piping, ductwork, or any other part of the building structure which, when dry, may be crumbled, pulverized, or reduced to powder by hand pressure;

“Meeting” means all gatherings of every kind, including video teleconferences;

“Video teleconference” means one (1) meeting, occurring in two (2) or more locations, where individuals can see and hear each other by means of video and audio equipment;

“Writing” or “written” shall mean letters, words, or numbers, or their equivalent, set down by handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating, photographing, magnetic impulse, mechanical or electronic recording, or other form of data compilation;

“Branch budget” shall have the same meaning as in KRS

48.010

;

“Reverse auction” shall have the same meaning as in KRS

45A.070

;

“Headquarters” means the principal office where the principal executives of the entity are located and from which other personnel, branches, affiliates, offices, or entities are controlled;

“Nonretail service and technology project” means and includes the acquisition of any real estate and the construction, acquisition, equipping, and installation thereon and with respect thereto of improvements and facilities necessary and useful for the improvement of that real estate for conveyance to or lease to nonretail service and technology entities to be used for call centers, centralized administrative or processing centers, telephone or Internet sales order or processing centers, distribution or fulfillment centers, data processing centers, research and development facilities, or other similar activities; and

“Nonretail service and technology entity” means any corporation, partnership, person, or other legal entity, whether domestic or foreign, which will itself or through its subsidiaries and affiliates operate call centers, centralized administrative or processing centers, telephone or Internet sales order or processing centers, distribution or fulfillment centers, data processing centers, and research and development facilities, or conduct other similar activities.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1949 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 11, § 1; 1956 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. XVI, § 1; 1962, ch. 15, § 1; 1964, ch. 7, § 1; 1966, ch. 255, § 58; 1968, ch. 199, § 1; 1970, ch. 204, § 8; 1976, ch. 205, § 1, effective October 1, 1976; 1982, ch. 447, § 10, effective January 1, 1984; 1986, ch. 350, § 2, effective April 8, 1986; 1986, ch. 357, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 395, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; repealed and reenact., Acts 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 284, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 387, § 25, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 120, § 22, effective July 15, 1998; 2009, ch. 78, § 35, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 63, § 9, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 199, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

56.450.
State Property and Buildings Commission — Issuance of revenue bonds.

There is recognized, as an independent agency of the state within the meaning of KRS Chapter 12, and as a constituted authority of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, a state and a sovereign entity within the meaning of regulations of the United States Department of the Treasury, Internal Revenue Service, a State Property and Buildings Commission composed of the Governor, who shall be chairman thereof, the Lieutenant Governor who shall be vice chairman of the commission, the Attorney General, the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development, the executive director of the Office of the Controller, the state budget director, and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, or their alternates as authorized in subsection (5) of this section.

No member of the commission shall receive any salary, fee, or other remuneration for his services as a member of the commission, but each member shall be entitled to be reimbursed for his ordinary traveling expenses, including meals and lodging, incurred in the performance of his duties.

The commission shall constitute a public body corporate with perpetual succession and power in its name to contract and be contracted with, sue and be sued, adopt bylaws, have and use a corporate seal, and exercise all of the powers granted to private corporations generally in KRS Chapter 271B, except as that chapter may be inconsistent with KRS

56.440

to

56.550

.

Subject to the provisions of KRS

56.550

, but notwithstanding any other provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the contrary, all revenue bonds issued by state agencies, except as provided in this chapter (but not including bonds issued directly by and in the name of the Commonwealth of Kentucky under authorization of the executive cabinet), shall be issued under the provisions of this chapter. As an additional and alternative method for the issuance of revenue bonds under the provisions of this chapter, upon application of any state agency and approval by the commission, the commission acting for and on behalf of said state agency may issue revenue bonds in its own name, in accordance with the terms and provisions of KRS Chapter 58, secured by and payable solely from all or any part of the revenues of the state agency as may be specified and provided in the approved application. Any covenants and undertakings of the state agency in the approved application with regard to the production of revenues and the use, application, or disposition thereof may be enforced by the holders of any of the revenue bonds or by any trustee for such bondholders. The issuance of any revenue bonds for the state or any of its agencies by or on behalf of the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority and the issuance of any revenue bonds for economic development projects authorized by Acts 1980, Ch. 109, shall require the prior approval of the State Property and Buildings Commission. In issuing bonds under its own name, or in approving issuance of bonds by other state agencies, the commission shall be deemed to be acting for the state government of the Commonwealth of Kentucky as one (1) unit within the meaning of the regulations of the United States Department of the Treasury, Internal Revenue Service, and it shall be limited to the issuance of bonds to accomplish the public purposes of that unit.

Each member of the commission may designate, by an instrument in writing over his signature and filed with the secretary as a public record of the commission, an alternate with full authority to attend in the absence of the appointing member for any reason, any properly convened meeting of the commission and to participate in the consideration of, and voting upon, business and transactions of the commission. Any designation of an alternate may, in the discretion of the appointing member, be limited upon the face of the appointing instrument, to be effective only for a designated meeting or only for specified business; or the same may be shown on the face of the appointing instrument to be on a continuing basis (but in no case for a period of more than four (4) years), whenever the appointing member is unable to attend, but always subject to revocation by the appointing member in an instrument of like formality, similarly filed with the secretary as a public record of the commission. Any party transacting business with the commission, or materially affected thereby, shall be entitled to accept and rely upon a joint certificate of the secretary of the commission and any member of the commission concerning the designation of any alternate, the time of designation, the scope thereof, and if of a continuing nature, whether the same has been revoked, and when; and the joint certificate shall be made and delivered to any such party within a reasonable time after written request is made therefor with acceptable identification of the business or transaction referred, and of the requesting party’s interest therein. Each alternate shall be a person on the staff of the appointing member, or in the employ of his agency or department of the government of the Commonwealth, as the case may be.

Any four (4) members of the commission, or their alternates authorized under paragraph (a) of this subsection, shall constitute a quorum and shall by majority vote be authorized to transact any and all business of the commission.

The State Property and Buildings Commission is reconstituted as of October 1, 1976, with the powers herein provided.

History.

Enact. Acts 1949 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 11, § 2; 1960, ch. 63, Art. XIII; 1962, ch. 15, § 2; 1964, ch. 7, § 2; 1972, ch. 274, § 144; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(2); 1976, ch. 205, § 2, effective October 1, 1976; 1980, ch. 141, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1980, ch. 295, § 16, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 396, § 7, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 476, Pt. IV, § 118, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 105, § 58, effective March 30, 1992; 1996, ch. 101, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2005, ch. 85, § 79, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 12, § 30, effective June 25, 2009.

56.460.
Commission to transfer to cabinet capital outlay appropriation.

The commission shall transfer to the cabinet any appropriation which may be made to it, to be expended for the purpose of acquiring real estate and for building projects for any state agency, and for matching federal funds available under 42 U.S.C. ch. 6A, subch. IV (secs. 291 et seq.) or any other federal law for the purchase, construction, improvement, or repairing of property to be used for public purposes, whether owned by the Commonwealth or any agency thereof, or by any political subdivision or municipality, or by nonprofit corporations or associations. All expenditures shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1949 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 11, § 3; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. XVI, § 2; 1968, ch. 152, § 21.

56.462.
Duties of cabinet.

The cabinet shall maintain the records and perform the functions necessary and proper to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. XVI, § 3; 1966, ch. 255, § 59.

56.463.
Powers of cabinet in determining need, controlling, and disposing of real estate.

The cabinet shall have the power and duty:

To determine the comparative needs and demands of the various state agencies for acquiring real estate and for building projects;

To purchase or otherwise acquire all real property determined to be needed for state use and upon the approval of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet as to the determination of need and as to the action of purchase or other acquisition, except as provided in KRS Chapters 175, 176, 177, and 180. All such acquisitions of real property or interests therein shall be made in accordance with KRS

45A.045

;

To sell or otherwise dispose of all property, including any interest in real property, of the state that is not needed or has become unsuitable for public use or would be more suitable consistent with the public interest for some other use as determined by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. All such sales or other disposition shall be made in accordance with KRS

45A.045

;

To control the use of any real property owned or otherwise held by the Commonwealth, or any state agency, and to determine for what periods of time and for what purposes any state agency may use the same, including the agency for whose use it was initially acquired or improved, and to determine what appropriate uses shall be made of such real property during periods that the cabinet finds the same is not required for the purposes of any particular state agency. The cabinet shall allocate to the General Assembly and the Legislative Research Commission the amount of space within the New State Capitol Annex, currently assigned to the legislative branch in the basement and on the first floor totaling forty-nine thousand six hundred thirty-eight (49,638) square feet; approximately twenty-four thousand four hundred fifty-two (24,452) square feet on the second floor from an imaginary line running north and south down the center of the center wing hallway of the building and all space to the east of this line, excluding mechanical areas, public entrances, and restrooms; approximately twenty-three thousand nine hundred forty (23,940) square feet on the third floor from an imaginary line running north and south down the center of the center wing hallway of the building and all space to the east of this line, excluding mechanical areas, public entrances, and restrooms; approximately twenty-two thousand fifty-six (22,056) square feet on the fourth floor from an imaginary line running north and south down the center of the center wing hallway of the building and all space to the east of this line, excluding mechanical areas, public entrances, and restrooms. All space assigned to the legislative branch and plans, uses, furnishings, and equipment therefor are subject to the specific approval of the Legislative Research Commission;

All additional space in the New State Capitol Annex, not specifically allocated for use by the General Assembly and the Legislative Research Commission in paragraph (a) of this subsection, shall be allocated for the use of the legislative branch, with occupancy by the legislative branch to be determined by the Legislative Research Commission. Until the Legislative Research Commission, by vote of a majority of its entire membership, determines that the legislative branch shall occupy all or part of such additional space in the Capitol Annex, the cabinet shall continue to determine the occupancy of such additional space;

Forty percent (40%) of the floor space provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection for use by the legislative branch shall be assigned for the use of the Senate. Sixty percent (60%) of the floor space provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection for use by the legislative branch shall be assigned for the use of the House of Representatives; and

To determine the housing and furnishings needs of the various state agencies located in Frankfort and to establish and put into effect a permanent program for housing them. Subject to paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection, the cabinet is also authorized and directed to allocate office space and furnishings in existing public buildings located in Frankfort, exclusive of the third and fourth floors of the New State Capitol and the space in the New State Capitol Annex allocated to the legislative branch, according to the needs of the various agencies. When necessary, the cabinet is authorized to provide additional office space and furnishings in Frankfort under any building program the cabinet deems most advisable and economical for the state. The permanent housing program shall include provisions for housing the General Assembly and its related agencies, including the Legislative Research Commission, and its subcommittees, the executive offices, the Supreme Court and the clerk of the Supreme Court, the Department of Law and the law library, in the New State Capitol, provided the General Assembly and the Legislative Research Commission shall have complete control and exclusive use of the third and fourth floors of the New State Capitol and shall have exclusive use of the space in the New State Capitol Annex allocated to them under paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection. If there be any additional space in the Capitol, it shall be assigned to agencies whose activities are most closely related to the agencies directed to be located permanently in the Capitol;

To acquire, by condemnation in the manner provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky, any real estate necessary for use by the state or by any state agency, when the cabinet is unable to agree with the owner thereof on a price for such real estate;

To lease any real property, or any interest in such real property, owned by the state or any agency thereof, in accordance with KRS

45A.045

;

To provide for and adopt plans and specifications as may be necessary, to provide adequate public notice for and receive bids for any expenditures proposed to be made, to award contracts for the purpose authorized, to supervise construction and make changes and revisions in plans and specifications or in construction as may become necessary, and generally to do any and all other things as may become necessary or expedient in order to effectively fulfill and carry out the purposes of this chapter, including the right to employ clerks, engineers, statisticians, architects, or other persons required to be employed in order to fulfill the functions of the Commonwealth relating to state property and buildings provided in KRS

56.450

to

56.550

; and

To adopt rules and promulgate administrative regulations as may be necessary to govern the acquisition, control, and disposition of the real property to which this section is applicable.

History.

Enact. Acts 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. XVI, § 4; 1966, ch. 111, § 1; 1974, ch. 372, § 1; 1976, ch. 62, § 52; 1976, ch. 140, § 19; 1978, ch. 218, § 1, effective March 30, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 539, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 226, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 497, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 496, § 31, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 510, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 120, § 23, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 153, § 1, effective June 24, 2003.

56.464.
Payment of moving expenses of persons displaced on acquisition of land by state — Limits. [Repealed.]

56.465.
Disposition of land in custody of state agency.

In any case where the real property that is proposed to be sold pursuant to KRS

56.463

is in the custody of a state agency, the cabinet may submit to such agency a general description of the intended use of the land, along with such detailed information as the agency may require, but the finding of the cabinet on the question of selling and conveying the real property shall be final. Disposition shall be made in accordance with KRS

45A.045

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1958, ch. 140, § 2; 1966, ch. 111, § 2; 1990, ch. 496, § 32, effective July 13, 1990.

56.467.
Commission to assist school financing.

The commission shall exercise the powers prescribed by KRS

162.520

,

162.540

,

162.550

,

162.580

,

162.590

,

162.600

, and

162.620

for the purpose of assisting boards of education of any county or independent school district in financing public school building projects and undertakings.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 7, §
7; 1966, ch. 255, §
60; repealed and reenact., Acts 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 285, effective July 13, 1990.

56.470.
Acquisition of real estate by state agency.

No state agency shall acquire any real property without first meeting the approval of the cabinet. The cabinet may approve, modify, or disapprove the proposed acquisition of real estate, and the finding of the cabinet shall be final, except in cases where the issuance and sale of bonds is proposed, in which cases the cabinet shall submit its findings to the commission for approval, modification or disapproval. If a proposed acquisition of real property is approved as provided in this section, either in whole or in part, the cabinet shall make the acquisition. Acquisition shall be made in accordance with KRS

45A.045

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1949 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 11, § 4; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. XVI, § 5; 1966, ch. 111, § 3; 1990, ch. 496, § 33, effective July 13, 1990.

56.480.
Engineers, appointments — Studies of land and building needs — Cost estimates.

The cabinet may appoint qualified licensed engineers and qualified graduate engineers may be appointed for a period not to exceed one (1) year without obtaining a license, who shall perform duties delegated to them from time to time by the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. The cabinet shall prepare necessary plans and specifications, shall investigate and make studies of the comparative need and demand for acquiring lands, or for the construction or reconstruction or structural maintenance of buildings, or the purchase, installation or construction of equipment, facilities or furnishings incidental or pertaining thereto, and shall make the estimates of cost required in connection with or incidental to the development, purchase, acquisition or construction of the foregoing. The engineering staff shall give technical assistance and perform other duties the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet requires. Review of construction plans for conformance with the Uniform State Building Code shall be conducted by the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction.

History.

Enact. Acts 1949 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 10, § 1; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. XVI, § 6; 1966, ch. 255, § 61; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(2); 1978, ch. 117, § 61, effective February 28, 1980; 2010, ch. 24, § 51, effective July 15, 2010.

56.490.
Approval required for proposed building projects; conditions of approval. [Repealed.]

56.491.
Approval required for certain projects — Conditions — Exceptions.

No state agency shall have power or authority to make plans and specifications, provide public notice of invitations for bids, let contracts, or incur any financing commitments, either in the way of a charge against public funds or in the way of negotiations for issuance of revenue bonds, for any capital construction projects involving the improvement of lands or the construction, alteration, reconstruction, or major repair of any building or other structure, or sewage disposal or water supply system, requiring the expenditure of more than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) without first securing the approval of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The state agency seeking the approval shall submit to the Finance and Administration Cabinet a general description of the proposed project, with the detailed information the cabinet may require. Review of construction plans for conformance with the Uniform State Building Code shall be conducted by the Department of Housing, Buildings and Construction. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall not approve any project requiring its approval in any instance if it finds that: the project is not needed; the proposed method of financing is not sound; the project will exceed the amount of the funds available therefor; the work contemplated will be insufficient to accomplish the purpose of the project; or after providing for the ordinary recurring expenses of government and debt service and for payments under existing allotments for extraordinary expenses and capital outlay, cash will not be available in the State Treasury to promptly pay for the work during the biennium, or except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, that the work is to be done by employees of the agency.

The finding of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall be final, except in cases where the issuance and sale of bonds is proposed, in which cases the cabinet shall submit its findings to the commission for final approval, modification, or disapproval.

Any capital construction project, the total cost of completion of which the Finance and Administration Cabinet determines will exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000), shall be contracted for on a competitive bid basis, and the execution of the contracts shall be approved and authorized by the cabinet. When a capital construction project has been approved as provided in this section, in whole or in part, the cabinet shall prepare the plans and specifications, provide public notice of invitations for bids, award the contracts, supervise the construction, and handle the financial negotiations on behalf of the requesting state agency; or with prior written approval, the cabinet may authorize a state agency to do so with delegated authority of the cabinet.

A capital construction project, the total cost of completion of which the Finance and Administration Cabinet determines will not exceed two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000), may be performed by the employees of the requesting agency or by individuals hired specifically for the project who shall be exempt from the requirements of KRS Chapter 18A, if the project is approved and authorized by the cabinet. Necessary materials and supplies shall be procured in accordance with the standard purchasing procedures and policies of the cabinet as defined in KRS Chapter 45A.

This section shall not apply to capital outlays to the Department of Highways for roads and bridges.

This section shall not apply to capital outlays by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet for repair, maintenance, improvement, or expansion of present correctional facilities on which projects inmates are used. Any capital construction project to be performed by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall be approved and authorized by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

This section shall not apply to surveys capable of being performed by employees of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources. Boundary surveys or surveys involving property lines shall be performed by or under the supervision of an employee possessing a professional land surveyor license.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 174, § 1; 1970, ch. 146, § 1; 1972, ch. 247, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1978, ch. 117, § 62, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 338, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 331, § 14, effective July 15, 1986; 1986, ch. 338, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 496, § 34, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 211, § 11, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 15, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 120, § 24, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 225, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 127, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 127, effective June 26, 2007; 2009, ch. 72, § 1, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 52, effective July 15, 2010.

56.493.
Plans for public buildings to consider needs of handicapped. [Repealed.]

56.495.
Kentucky university and college projects.

The boards of regents of the respective state universities and the Kentucky Community and Technical College System and the board of trustees of the University of Kentucky may issue, under the provisions of KRS

162.340

to

162.380

, consolidated educational building revenue bonds or housing bonds, provided that prior to seeking the final approval required by KRS

56.491

, the board of the state university or the Kentucky Community and Technical College System shall submit to the commission, through the cabinet, a request for approval of the project before any financial commitment of any sort may be made in connection therewith, including employment of architects, engineers, fiscal agents, or attorneys. The request shall include a general description of the project and its need, use, location, approximate size, and such other information as the cabinet may require. After approval by the commission, the cabinet shall appoint fiscal agents, bond counsel, and architects and engineers as may be required to make plans and specifications or financial arrangements for the project.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 7, §
5; repealed and reenact., Acts 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 286, effective July 13, 1990; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 36, effective May 30, 1997.

56.500.
Powers of state agencies to acquire or dispose of land limited.

No state agency, except as provided in this chapter, shall have power or authority:

To acquire by purchase, lease, condemnation, or other means, any real property, including any interest in real property, except as provided by this chapter and KRS

45A.045

;

To lease, sell, or convey any real property, including any interest in real property, belonging to the state or to any state agency, except as provided by this chapter and KRS

45A.045

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1949 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 11, § 7; 1956 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 7, Art. XVI, § 8; 1958, ch. 140, § 1; 1966, ch. 111, § 4; 1990, ch. 496, § 35, effective July 13, 1990.

56.505.
Legislative intent respecting industrial development projects.

It is hereby found, determined and declared as a legislative finding of fact that the general welfare and well-being of the citizens of the Commonwealth is inextricably connected with and related to the economic opportunities which may be created and made available to them and that it is the legitimate business of Kentucky state government in an increasingly complex society to provide to the maximum extent practicable the impetus for economic development in the Commonwealth by the creation and financing of programs which will directly and proximately cause the location of major industries in the Commonwealth.

It is hereby further found, determined and declared as a legislative finding of fact that the establishment of major manufacturing, processing and assembling facilities on sites which may be acquired and developed by the Commonwealth for such uses will proximately result in increased tax revenues to the Commonwealth, as taxing entity, including state corporate income taxes, state income taxes paid by employees who work in such facilities, state property taxes, state corporation license taxes and state sales and use taxes, which would not be received by the Commonwealth but for the establishment of such manufacturing, processing and assembling facilities and which tax receipts are hereby found, determined and declared to constitute receipt of value by the Commonwealth for the lease or conveyance of any such sites, as developed and improved, to persons, firms and corporations establishing major manufacturing, processing and assembling facilities on such sites.

It is the purpose of KRS

56.510

,

56.513

and

56.514

to promote the gainful employment, business and economic development opportunities and general welfare of the citizens and residents of the Commonwealth by the creation of authority to enable the Commonwealth to acquire real estate for use as manufacturing, processing and assembling sites, and to develop such sites for occupancy, use, lease or conveyance to industrial corporations, partnerships and other entities which will provide citizens and residents of the Commonwealth with employment opportunities and will provide to the Commonwealth additional tax revenues. The authority granted by KRS

56.510

,

56.513

and

56.514

and the purposes to be accomplished by this section are hereby declared to be public purposes for which public money may be expended. The General Assembly hereby declares that financing the acquisition and development of sites for industries pursuant to KRS 56.510, 56.513 and 56.514 is governmental and public in nature.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 350, § 1, effective April 8, 1986.